District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-2907

Boards of examiners; appointment; composition; term of office; qualifications; compensation; officers; rules

Repealed.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 1104(e), 33 DCR 729

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 2-1301 to 2-1343.